Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB434.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 401.010 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person at least eighteen (18) years of age may have his or her name changed by
the District Court of the county in which he or she resides. If he or she resides on a
United States Army post, military reservation, or fort, his or her name may be
changed by the District Court of any adjacent county[ adjacent thereto].
(2) (a) A family member of a deceased person may have the deceased person's
name changed posthumously if the name is a result of marriage to a person
arrested for or charged with the intentional, knowing, or wanton
commission of an offense that resulted in the death of the deceased.
(b) The right to have the name of the deceased person changed posthumously
devolves on a family member in the priority listed in KRS 367.93117, but
shall not include a spouse.
(c) A posthumous name change shall proceed as provided in subsection (1) of
this section.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 9/10/2025 2:47 PM Jacketed